Alaska statutes. Title 9. Code of Civil Procedure.
Article 1. Attachment.

Sec. 09.40.010.
Actions in which attachment is authorized.

At any time after an action has been commenced the plaintiff may make application to the court to have the property of the defendant attached as security for the satisfaction of a judgment that may be recovered in the following cases:

in an action upon an express or implied contract for the payment of money if the contract is neither secured by mortgage, lien, nor pledge upon real or personal property, or, if secured, the security is insufficient to satisfy a judgment that may be recovered by the plaintiff;

in an action upon an express or implied contract against a defendant not residing in the state;

in an action for the collection of a state tax or license fee.

An attachment may not issue if the defendant gives security to pay a judgment that may be recovered as provided in AS

09.40.010

—

09.40.110

.

History.

(§ 7.01 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1994, in (b) of this section “An attachment may not” was substituted for “No attachment shall” to conform the section to the current style of Alaska Statutes.

Cross references. —

For related provisions on availability of attachment, see Civ.
R. 89(a); for provisions on security as a bar, see Civ. R. 89(j).

Sec. 09.40.020.
Undertaking.

Before the writ is issued, the plaintiff shall give a written undertaking with sufficient sureties to the effect that, if the defendant recovers judgment, the plaintiff will pay all costs that may be awarded to the defendant and all damages that the defendant may sustain by reason of the attachment, not exceeding the sum specified in the undertaking, and that, if the attachment is discharged on the ground that the plaintiff was not entitled to it under AS

09.40.010

—

09.40.110

, the plaintiff will pay all damages that the defendant may have sustained by reason of the attachment, not exceeding the sum specified in the undertaking.
The sum specified in the undertaking shall be equal to the amount claimed by the plaintiff, but not less than $100.

History.

(§ 7.02 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Cross references. —

For related provisions, see Civ. R. 89(a), (g) and (h).

Sec. 09.40.025.
Appointment of person to serve attachment process.

Service of all process relating to attachment may be made by a person specially appointed by the court for that purpose.

History.

(§ 1 ch 65 SLA 1962)

Cross references. —

For related provisions, see Civ. R. 4 and 89(f).

Sec. 09.40.030.
Property subject to attachment.

All property in the state not exempt from execution may be attached.

History.

(§ 7.03 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Cross references. —

For property exempt from execution, see AS 09.38.

Administrative Code. —

For permanent fund dividend program, see 15 AAC 23, art. 1.

Opinions of attorney general. —

A liquor license issued by the State of Alaska is not a property right but merely a personal privilege and, as such, is not subject to attachment or execution. 1967 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 4.

Sec. 09.40.040.
Third party liability.

All persons having in their possession personal property belonging to the defendant or owing a debt to the defendant at the time of service upon them of the writ and notice shall deliver, transfer, or pay the property or debts to the peace officer, or be liable to the plaintiff for the amount of the property or debts until the attachment is discharged or a judgment recovered by plaintiff is satisfied. Debts and other personal property may be delivered, transferred, or paid to the peace officer without suit, and the receipt of the officer is a sufficient discharge.

History.

(§ 7.04 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.40.050.
Lien on real estate.

If real property is attached, the peace officer shall make a certificate containing the title of the cause, the names of the parties, a description of the property attached, the date of attachment, a statement that a writ of attachment has been issued, and the date of issuance, and shall within 10 days deliver the certificate to the recorder of the recording district in which the real property is situated.
The recorder shall record the certificate in a book to be kept for that purpose. When the certificate is recorded, the lien in favor of the plaintiff attaches to the real property described in the certificate from the date of the attachment, but if recorded afterwards, it only attaches as against third persons from the date of the subsequent recording.
Whenever the lien is discharged, it is the duty of the recorder, when requested, to record the transcript of an order, entry of satisfaction of judgment, or other proceeding of record whereby it appears that the lien has been discharged.

History.

(§ 7.05 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Revisor’s notes. —

Minor word changes related to the recording of documents were made in this section in 1988 under sec. 42, ch. 161, SLA 1988.

Sec. 09.40.060.
Third party indebted to defendant or possessing property of defendant.

When a peace officer with a writ of attachment applies to a person for the purpose of attaching property mentioned in the attachment, the person shall within a reasonable time and in any event within 24 hours furnish the peace officer with a statement designating the amount and description of any personal property in the person’s possession belonging to the defendant, or any debt the person owes to the defendant.
If the person refuses to do so, or if the statement is unsatisfactory to the plaintiff, the person may be ordered to appear before the court and be examined concerning the property or debt.

History.

(§ 7.06 ch 101 SLA 1962; am § 1 ch 35 SLA 1966)

Cross references. —

For procedures on garnishment proceedings, see Civ.
R. 89(l).

Legislative history reports. —

For report on ch. 35 SLA 1966 (CSHB 48 am CFC), see 1966 House Journal, p. 142.

Sec. 09.40.070.
Sale of perishable property.

If any of the property attached is perishable, the peace officer shall sell the property in the manner in which property is sold on execution. The proceeds and other property attached shall be retained by the officer to answer a judgment that may be recovered in the action unless sooner subjected to execution upon another judgment recovered previous to the levy of attachment.

History.

(§ 7.07 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Cross references. —

For provisions on discharge upon sale, undertaking, and delivery, see Civ. R. 89(o).

Collateral references. —

Construction and effect of provision for execution sale on short notice, or sale in advance of judgment under writ of attachment, where property involved is subject to decay or depreciation, 3 ALR3d 593.

Sec. 09.40.080.
Liability on undertaking.

In a proceeding brought against the principal or the sureties upon an undertaking given to secure the release of attached property, it is a defense that the property for which the undertaking was given did not, at the execution of the writ of attachment, belong to the defendant against whom it was issued.

History.

(§ 7.08 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.40.090.
Disposition of property after judgment in plaintiff’s favor.

When plaintiff recovers judgment, and the property attached in the suit was not sold as perishable property or discharged from the attachment, the court shall order the property to be sold to satisfy the plaintiff’s demands.
If execution is issued upon the judgment, the peace officer shall apply the property attached, including money or the proceeds from the sale of the property, upon the execution.
If there is any of the property or proceeds remaining after satisfying the execution, the peace officer shall, upon demand, deliver the property or proceeds to the defendant.

History.

(§ 7.09 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.40.100.
Return of property upon judgment for defendant.

If the defendant recovers judgment against the plaintiff and no appeal is taken, all the property attached, the proceeds from property attached, and the undertaking received in the action shall be delivered to the defendant upon service upon the peace officer of a certified copy of the order discharging the attachment.

History.

(§ 7.10 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.40.110.
Delivery of property to defendant and redelivery bond.

The peace officer may deliver any of the property attached to the defendant, or to a person claiming it, upon the giving of a written undertaking for the property executed by one or more sufficient sureties, engaging to redeliver it or pay the value of the property to the peace officer to whom execution upon a judgment obtained by the plaintiff in that action may be issued.

History.

(§ 7.11 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Cross references. —

For related provisions, see Civ. R. 89(j).